District of Columbia statutes.
29-1207.02

Merger.

(a)

A statutory trust may merge with one or more other constituent organizations pursuant to this section, §§ 29-1207.03 through 29-1207.05, and a plan of merger if:

(1)

The merger is not prohibited by the governing law of any constituent organization; and

(2)

Each of the other organizations complies with its governing law in effecting the merger.

(b)

A plan of merger shall be in a record and shall include:

(1)

The name and form of each constituent organization;

(2)

The name and form of the surviving organization and, if the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, a statement to that effect;

(3)

The terms and conditions of the merger, including the manner and basis for converting or exchanging the interests in each constituent organization into any combination of money, interests in the surviving organization, and other consideration;

(4)

If the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, the surviving organization’s organizational documents; and

(5)

If the surviving organization is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to be made by the merger to the surviving organization’s organizational documents.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 702 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.